Louisiana, session 2026, SB184.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 49:149.37 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§149.37. Coach D-D Breaux Gymnastics Training Facility
Notwithstanding the provisions of R.S. 42:267, or any other law to the
contrary, the state building situated on the campus of Louisiana State
University and Agricultural and Mechanical College in the city of Baton Rouge,
located on Cypress Lane, and generally known as the LSU Gymnastics Training
Facility, is hereby named and shall hereafter be known as the Coach D-D
Breaux Gymnastics Training Facility.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-271 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 184
effective on the day following such approval.